src/Korektor/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1408 Y 27
SFX 1408 ати ати
SFX 1408 ати им
SFX 1408 ати иш
SFX 1408 ати и
SFX 1408 ати имо
SFX 1408 ати ите
SFX 1408 ати е
SFX 1408 ати ао
SFX 1408 ати ала
SFX 1408 ати ало
SFX 1408 ати али
SFX 1408 ати але
SFX 1408 ати аћу
SFX 1408 ати аћеш
SFX 1408 ати аће
SFX 1408 ати аћемо
SFX 1408 ати аћете
SFX 1408 ати аће
SFX 1408 ати и
SFX 1408 ати имо
SFX 1408 ати ите
SFX 1408 ати ах
SFX 1408 ати аше
SFX 1408 ати асмо
SFX 1408 ати асте
SFX 1408 ати аху
SFX 1408 ати ићи

SFX 1409 Y 27
SFX 1409 ети ети
SFX 1409 ети им
SFX 1409 ети иш
SFX 1409 ети и
SFX 1409 ети имо
SFX 1409 ети ите
SFX 1409 ети е
SFX 1409 ети ео
SFX 1409 ети ела
SFX 1409 ети ело
SFX 1409 ети ели
SFX 1409 ети еле
SFX 1409 ети ећу
SFX 1409 ети ећеш
SFX 1409 ети еће
SFX 1409 ети ећемо
SFX 1409 ети ећете
SFX 1409 ети еће
SFX 1409 ети и
SFX 1409 ети имо
SFX 1409 ети ите
SFX 1409 ети ех
SFX 1409 ети еше
SFX 1409 ети есмо
SFX 1409 ети есте
SFX 1409 ети аху
SFX 1409 ети ећи

SFX 1410 Y 27
SFX 1410 тјети тјети
SFX 1410 тјети тим
SFX 1410 тјети тиш
SFX 1410 тјети ти
SFX 1410 тјети тимо
SFX 1410 тјети тите
SFX 1410 тјети те
SFX 1410 тјети тио
SFX 1410 тјети тјела
SFX 1410 тјети тјело
SFX 1410 тјети тјели
SFX 1410 тјети тјеле
SFX 1410 тјети тјећу
SFX 1410 тјети тјећеш
SFX 1410 тјети тјеће
SFX 1410 тјети тјећемо
SFX 1410 тјети тјећете
SFX 1410 тјети тјеће
SFX 1410 тјети ти
SFX 1410 тјети тимо
SFX 1410 тјети тите
SFX 1410 тјети тјех
SFX 1410 тјети тјеше
SFX 1410 тјети тјесмо
SFX 1410 тјети тјесте
SFX 1410 тјети ћаху
SFX 1410 тјети тјећи

SFX 1411 Y 38
SFX 1411 гати гати
SFX 1411 гати гам
SFX 1411 гати гаш
SFX 1411 гати га
SFX 1411 гати гамо
SFX 1411 гати гате
SFX 1411 гати гају
SFX 1411 гати жем
SFX 1411 гати жеш
SFX 1411 гати же
SFX 1411 гати жемо
SFX 1411 гати жете
SFX 1411 гати жу
SFX 1411 гати гао
SFX 1411 гати гала
SFX 1411 гати гало
SFX 1411 гати гали
SFX 1411 гати гале
SFX 1411 гати гаћу
SFX 1411 гати гаћеш
SFX 1411 гати гаће
SFX 1411 гати гаћемо
SFX 1411 гати гаћете
SFX 1411 гати гаће
SFX 1411 гати гај
SFX 1411 гати гајмо
SFX 1411 гати гајте
SFX 1411 гати жи
SFX 1411 гати жимо
SFX 1411 гати жите
SFX 1411 гати гах
SFX 1411 гати гаше
SFX 1411 гати гасмо
SFX 1411 гати гасте
SFX 1411 гати жаху
SFX 1411 гати гаху
SFX 1411 гати гајући
SFX 1411 гати жући

SFX 1412 Y 36
SFX 1412 ити ити
SFX 1412 ити им
SFX 1412 ити иш
SFX 1412 ити и
SFX 1412 ити имо
SFX 1412 ити ите
SFX 1412 ити е
SFX 1412 ити ијем
SFX 1412 ити ијеш
SFX 1412 ити ије
SFX 1412 ити ијемо
SFX 1412 ити ијете
SFX 1412 ити ију
SFX 1412 ити ио
SFX 1412 ити ила
SFX 1412 ити ило
SFX 1412 ити или
SFX 1412 ити иле
SFX 1412 ити ићу
SFX 1412 ити ићеш
SFX 1412 ити иће
SFX 1412 ити ићемо
SFX 1412 ити ићете
SFX 1412 ити иће
SFX 1412 ити и
SFX 1412 ити имо
SFX 1412 ити ите
SFX 1412 ити иј
SFX 1412 ити ијмо
SFX 1412 ити ијте
SFX 1412 ити их
SFX 1412 ити ише
SFX 1412 ити исмо
SFX 1412 ити исте
SFX 1412 ити љаху
SFX 1412 ити ећи

SFX 1413 Y 33
SFX 1413 нути нути
SFX 1413 нути нем
SFX 1413 нути неш
SFX 1413 нути не
SFX 1413 нути немо
SFX 1413 нути нете
SFX 1413 нути ну
SFX 1413 нути нуо
SFX 1413 нути нула
SFX 1413 нути нуло
SFX 1413 нути нули
SFX 1413 нути нуле
SFX 1413 нути ао
SFX 1413 нути ла
SFX 1413 нути ло
SFX 1413 нути ли
SFX 1413 нути ле
SFX 1413 нути нућу
SFX 1413 нути нућеш
SFX 1413 нути нуће
SFX 1413 нути нућемо
SFX 1413 нути нућете
SFX 1413 нути нуће
SFX 1413 нути ни
SFX 1413 нути нимо
SFX 1413 нути ните
SFX 1413 нути нух
SFX 1413 нути ну
SFX 1413 нути нуше
SFX 1413 нути нусмо
SFX 1413 нути нусте
SFX 1413 нути нијаху
SFX 1413 нути нувши

SFX 1414 Y 29
SFX 1414 зати зати
SFX 1414 зати жем
SFX 1414 зати жеш
SFX 1414 зати же
SFX 1414 зати жемо
SFX 1414 зати жете
SFX 1414 зати жу
SFX 1414 зати зао
SFX 1414 зати зала
SFX 1414 зати зало
SFX 1414 зати зали
SFX 1414 зати зале
SFX 1414 зати заћу
SFX 1414 зати заћеш
SFX 1414 зати заће
SFX 1414 зати заћемо
SFX 1414 зати заћете
SFX 1414 зати заће
SFX 1414 зати жи
SFX 1414 зати жимо
SFX 1414 зати жите
SFX 1414 зати зах
SFX 1414 зати за
SFX 1414 зати заше
SFX 1414 зати засмо
SFX 1414 зати засте
SFX 1414 зати заху
SFX 1414 зати жући
SFX 1414 зати завши

SFX 1415 Y 29
SFX 1415 лети лети
SFX 1415 лети лим
SFX 1415 лети лиш
SFX 1415 лети ли
SFX 1415 лети лимо
SFX 1415 лети лите
SFX 1415 лети ле
SFX 1415 лети лео
SFX 1415 лети лела
SFX 1415 лети лело
SFX 1415 лети лели
SFX 1415 лети леле
SFX 1415 лети лећу
SFX 1415 лети лећеш
SFX 1415 лети леће
SFX 1415 лети лећемо
SFX 1415 лети лећете
SFX 1415 лети леће
SFX 1415 лети ли
SFX 1415 лети лимо
SFX 1415 лети лите
SFX 1415 лети лех
SFX 1415 лети ле
SFX 1415 лети леше
SFX 1415 лети лесмо
SFX 1415 лети лесте
SFX 1415 лети љаху
SFX 1415 лети лећи
SFX 1415 лети левши

SFX 1416 Y 27
SFX 1416 ати ати
SFX 1416 ати ем
SFX 1416 ати еш
SFX 1416 ати е
SFX 1416 ати емо
SFX 1416 ати ете
SFX 1416 ати у
SFX 1416 ати ао
SFX 1416 ати ала
SFX 1416 ати ало
SFX 1416 ати али
SFX 1416 ати але
SFX 1416 ати аћу
SFX 1416 ати аћеш
SFX 1416 ати аће
SFX 1416 ати аћемо
SFX 1416 ати аћете
SFX 1416 ати аће
SFX 1416 ати и
SFX 1416 ати имо
SFX 1416 ати ите
SFX 1416 ати ах
SFX 1416 ати аше
SFX 1416 ати асмо
SFX 1416 ати асте
SFX 1416 ати аху
SFX 1416 ати ући

SFX 1417 Y 28
SFX 1417 сти сти
SFX 1417 сти зем
SFX 1417 сти зеш
SFX 1417 сти зе
SFX 1417 сти земо
SFX 1417 сти зете
SFX 1417 сти зу
SFX 1417 сти зао
SFX 1417 сти зла
SFX 1417 сти зло
SFX 1417 сти зли
SFX 1417 сти зле
SFX 1417 сти шћу
SFX 1417 сти шћеш
SFX 1417 сти шће
SFX 1417 сти шћемо
SFX 1417 сти шћете
SFX 1417 сти шће
SFX 1417 сти зи
SFX 1417 сти зимо
SFX 1417 сти зите
SFX 1417 сти зох
SFX 1417 сти зо
SFX 1417 сти зоше
SFX 1417 сти зосмо
SFX 1417 сти зосте
SFX 1417 сти зоху
SFX 1417 сти зући

SFX 1418 Y 29
SFX 1418 дети дети
SFX 1418 дети дим
SFX 1418 дети диш
SFX 1418 дети ди
SFX 1418 дети димо
SFX 1418 дети дите
SFX 1418 дети де
SFX 1418 дети део
SFX 1418 дети дела
SFX 1418 дети дело
SFX 1418 дети дели
SFX 1418 дети деле
SFX 1418 дети дећу
SFX 1418 дети дећеш
SFX 1418 дети деће
SFX 1418 дети дећемо
SFX 1418 дети дећете
SFX 1418 дети деће
SFX 1418 дети ди
SFX 1418 дети димо
SFX 1418 дети дите
SFX 1418 дети дех
SFX 1418 дети де
SFX 1418 дети деше
SFX 1418 дети десмо
SFX 1418 дети десте
SFX 1418 дети ђаху
SFX 1418 дети дећи
SFX 1418 дети девши

SFX 1419 Y 29
SFX 1419 јети јети
SFX 1419 јети им
SFX 1419 јети иш
SFX 1419 јети и
SFX 1419 јети имо
SFX 1419 јети ите
SFX 1419 јети е
SFX 1419 јети ио
SFX 1419 јети јела
SFX 1419 јети јело
SFX 1419 јети јели
SFX 1419 јети јеле
SFX 1419 јети јећу
SFX 1419 јети јећеш
SFX 1419 јети јеће
SFX 1419 јети јећемо
SFX 1419 јети јећете
SFX 1419 јети јеће
SFX 1419 јети и
SFX 1419 јети имо
SFX 1419 јети ите
SFX 1419 јети јех
SFX 1419 јети је
SFX 1419 јети јеше
SFX 1419 јети јесмо
SFX 1419 јети јесте
SFX 1419 јети ењаху
SFX 1419 јети јећи
SFX 1419 јети јевши

SFX 1420 Y 38
SFX 1420 јати јати
SFX 1420 јати јам
SFX 1420 јати јаш
SFX 1420 јати ја
SFX 1420 јати јамо
SFX 1420 јати јате
SFX 1420 јати јају
SFX 1420 јати јати
SFX 1420 јати јем
SFX 1420 јати јеш
SFX 1420 јати је
SFX 1420 јати јемо
SFX 1420 јати јете
SFX 1420 јати ју
SFX 1420 јати јао
SFX 1420 јати јала
SFX 1420 јати јало
SFX 1420 јати јали
SFX 1420 јати јале
SFX 1420 јати јаћу
SFX 1420 јати јаћеш
SFX 1420 јати јаће
SFX 1420 јати јаћемо
SFX 1420 јати јаћете
SFX 1420 јати јаће
SFX 1420 јати јај
SFX 1420 јати јајмо
SFX 1420 јати јајте
SFX 1420 јати ј
SFX 1420 јати јмо
SFX 1420 јати јте
SFX 1420 јати јах
SFX 1420 јати јаше
SFX 1420 јати јасмо
SFX 1420 јати јасте
SFX 1420 јати јаху
SFX 1420 јати јајући
SFX 1420 јати јући

SFX 1421 Y 27
SFX 1421 ти ти
SFX 1421 ти јем
SFX 1421 ти јеш
SFX 1421 ти је
SFX 1421 ти јемо
SFX 1421 ти јете
SFX 1421 ти ју
SFX 1421 ти о
SFX 1421 ти ла
SFX 1421 ти ло
SFX 1421 ти ли
SFX 1421 ти ле
SFX 1421 ти ћу
SFX 1421 ти ћеш
SFX 1421 ти ће
SFX 1421 ти ћемо
SFX 1421 ти ћете
SFX 1421 ти ће
SFX 1421 ти ј
SFX 1421 ти јмо
SFX 1421 ти јте
SFX 1421 ти х
SFX 1421 ти ше
SFX 1421 ти смо
SFX 1421 ти сте
SFX 1421 ти јаху
SFX 1421 ти јући

SFX 1422 Y 27
SFX 1422 нети нети
SFX 1422 нети ним
SFX 1422 нети ниш
SFX 1422 нети ни
SFX 1422 нети нимо
SFX 1422 нети ните
SFX 1422 нети не
SFX 1422 нети нео
SFX 1422 нети нела
SFX 1422 нети нело
SFX 1422 нети нели
SFX 1422 нети неле
SFX 1422 нети нећу
SFX 1422 нети нећеш
SFX 1422 нети неће
SFX 1422 нети нећемо
SFX 1422 нети нећете
SFX 1422 нети неће
SFX 1422 нети ни
SFX 1422 нети нимо
SFX 1422 нети ните
SFX 1422 нети нех
SFX 1422 нети неше
SFX 1422 нети несмо
SFX 1422 нети несте
SFX 1422 нети њаху
SFX 1422 нети нећи

SFX 1423 Y 27
SFX 1423 њети њети
SFX 1423 њети ним
SFX 1423 њети ниш
SFX 1423 њети ни
SFX 1423 њети нимо
SFX 1423 њети ните
SFX 1423 њети ни
SFX 1423 њети ио
SFX 1423 њети њела
SFX 1423 њети њело
SFX 1423 њети њели
SFX 1423 њети њеле
SFX 1423 њети њећу
SFX 1423 њети њећеш
SFX 1423 њети њеће
SFX 1423 њети њећемо
SFX 1423 њети њећете
SFX 1423 њети њеће
SFX 1423 њети ни
SFX 1423 њети нимо
SFX 1423 њети ните
SFX 1423 њети њех
SFX 1423 њети њеше
SFX 1423 њети њесмо
SFX 1423 њети њесте
SFX 1423 њети њаху
SFX 1423 њети њећи

SFX 1424 Y 27
SFX 1424 зати зати
SFX 1424 зати жем
SFX 1424 зати жеш
SFX 1424 зати же
SFX 1424 зати жемо
SFX 1424 зати жете
SFX 1424 зати жу
SFX 1424 зати зао
SFX 1424 зати зала
SFX 1424 зати зало
SFX 1424 зати зали
SFX 1424 зати зале
SFX 1424 зати заћу
SFX 1424 зати заћеш
SFX 1424 зати заће
SFX 1424 зати заћемо
SFX 1424 зати заћете
SFX 1424 зати заће
SFX 1424 зати жи
SFX 1424 зати жимо
SFX 1424 зати жите
SFX 1424 зати зах
SFX 1424 зати заше
SFX 1424 зати засмо
SFX 1424 зати засте
SFX 1424 зати заху
SFX 1424 зати жући

SFX 1425 Y 27
SFX 1425 зити зити
SFX 1425 зити зим
SFX 1425 зити зиш
SFX 1425 зити зи
SFX 1425 зити зимо
SFX 1425 зити зите
SFX 1425 зити зе
SFX 1425 зити зио
SFX 1425 зити зила
SFX 1425 зити зило
SFX 1425 зити зили
SFX 1425 зити зиле
SFX 1425 зити зићу
SFX 1425 зити зићеш
SFX 1425 зити зиће
SFX 1425 зити зићемо
SFX 1425 зити зићете
SFX 1425 зити зиће
SFX 1425 зити зи
SFX 1425 зити зимо
SFX 1425 зити зите
SFX 1425 зити зих
SFX 1425 зити зише
SFX 1425 зити зисмо
SFX 1425 зити зисте
SFX 1425 зити жаху
SFX 1425 зити зећи

SFX 1426 Y 28
SFX 1426 ати ати
SFX 1426 ати ам
SFX 1426 ати аш
SFX 1426 ати а
SFX 1426 ати амо
SFX 1426 ати ате
SFX 1426 ати ају
SFX 1426 ати ао
SFX 1426 ати ала
SFX 1426 ати ало
SFX 1426 ати али
SFX 1426 ати але
SFX 1426 ати аћу
SFX 1426 ати аћеш
SFX 1426 ати аће
SFX 1426 ати аћемо
SFX 1426 ати аћете
SFX 1426 ати аће
SFX 1426 ати ај
SFX 1426 ати ајмо
SFX 1426 ати ајте
SFX 1426 ати ах
SFX 1426 ати аше
SFX 1426 ати асмо
SFX 1426 ати асте
SFX 1426 ати аху
SFX 1426 ати ајући
SFX 1426 ати авши

SFX 1427 Y 34
SFX 1427 ати ати
SFX 1427 ати анем
SFX 1427 ати анеш
SFX 1427 ати ане
SFX 1427 ати анемо
SFX 1427 ати анете
SFX 1427 ати ану
SFX 1427 ати ао
SFX 1427 ати ала
SFX 1427 ати ало
SFX 1427 ати али
SFX 1427 ати але
SFX 1427 ати аћу
SFX 1427 ати аћеш
SFX 1427 ати аће
SFX 1427 ати аћемо
SFX 1427 ати аћете
SFX 1427 ати аће
SFX 1427 ати ани
SFX 1427 ати анимо
SFX 1427 ати аните
SFX 1427 ати ах
SFX 1427 ати а
SFX 1427 ати аше
SFX 1427 ати асмо
SFX 1427 ати асте
SFX 1427 ати аху
SFX 1427 ати адох
SFX 1427 ати аде
SFX 1427 ати адоше
SFX 1427 ати адосмо
SFX 1427 ати адосте
SFX 1427 ати адоху
SFX 1427 ати авши

SFX 1428 Y 28
SFX 1428 тити тити
SFX 1428 тити тим
SFX 1428 тити тиш
SFX 1428 тити ти
SFX 1428 тити тимо
SFX 1428 тити тите
SFX 1428 тити те
SFX 1428 тити тио
SFX 1428 тити тила
SFX 1428 тити тило
SFX 1428 тити тили
SFX 1428 тити тиле
SFX 1428 тити тићу
SFX 1428 тити тићеш
SFX 1428 тити тиће
SFX 1428 тити тићемо
SFX 1428 тити тићете
SFX 1428 тити тиће
SFX 1428 тити ти
SFX 1428 тити тимо
SFX 1428 тити тите
SFX 1428 тити тих
SFX 1428 тити ти
SFX 1428 тити тише
SFX 1428 тити тисмо
SFX 1428 тити тисте
SFX 1428 тити ћаху
SFX 1428 тити тивши
